Hawaii statutes.
§302A-623 Salary ranges, educational
officers. Salary ranges for educational officer positions of the
department shall be determined by the board based on the position
classification/compensation plan approved by the board. Salary ranges for
educational officer positions shall be subject to the requirements of section
302A-625. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 87, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next